Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-2907
Fees.

The officer shall establish and collect
the application fee required under section 77-2905 and the fee for the request
for final approval required under section 77-2906. Such fees shall be in amounts
sufficient to offset the costs of processing and monitoring applications filed
under the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Act. Such fees
shall be remitted by the officer to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet Revitalization Fund.

Laws 2014, LB191, § 7.